Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3312
County superintendent; elimination of office; county clerk; duties.

The office of county superintendent of schools shall be eliminated on June 30, 2000. The records of the office of county superintendent of schools shall be transferred to and maintained by the county clerk in each county.

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 63;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 14.